Washington statutes.
RCW 35.17.120

Officers and employees—Salaries and wages.

All appointive officers and employees shall receive such compensation as the commission shall fix by ordinance, payable monthly or at such shorter periods as the commission may determine.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.17.120. Prior: 1943 c 25 s 4, part; 1911 c 116 s 14, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 9103, part.]